Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Referendum on Sale of Beer

242.130.
Dry territory may allow sale of 3.2% beer. [Repealed.]

242.140.
Petition for referendum. [Repealed.]

242.150.
County judge/executive to order referendum. [Repealed.]

242.160.
Advertisement of referendum. [Repealed.]

242.170.
Question to be voted on — Conduct of referendum — Effect. [Repealed.]

242.180.
No referendum for three years after territory votes dry. [Repealed.]